Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.32.060

Manslaughter in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:

(a) He or she recklessly causes the death of another person; or

(b) He or she intentionally and unlawfully kills an unborn quick child by inflicting any injury upon the mother of such child.

(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a class A felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 357; 1997 c 365 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.32.060.]